Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2014.02
Postnatal care, defined.

Postnatal care means an office visit to a licensed health care professional occurring after birth, with reference to the infant or mother.

Laws 2022, LB905, § 12.